data/source/lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 18473 Y 16
SFX 18473 ai ai . 1597
SFX 18473 ai iau [^dijt]ai 152
SFX 18473 dai džiau . 152
SFX 18473 iai iau . 152
SFX 18473 jai jau . 152
SFX 18473 tai čiau . 152
SFX 18473 ai iausiai [^dijt]ai 157
SFX 18473 dai džiausiai . 157
SFX 18473 iai iausiai . 157
SFX 18473 jai jausiai . 157
SFX 18473 tai čiausiai . 157
SFX 18473 ai iausia [^dijt]ai 1598
SFX 18473 dai džiausia . 1598
SFX 18473 iai iausia . 1598
SFX 18473 jai jausia . 1598
SFX 18473 tai čiausia . 1598

SFX 18479 Y 5
SFX 18479 ai ėliau [^i]ai 155
SFX 18479 čiai tėliau . 155
SFX 18479 džiai dėliau . 155
SFX 18479 iai ėliau [^žč]iai 155
SFX 18479 žiai žėliau [^d]žiai 155

SFX 18494 Y 7
SFX 18494 i i . 1597
SFX 18494 i iau [^t]i 152
SFX 18494 ti čiau . 152
SFX 18494 i iausiai [^t]i 157
SFX 18494 ti čiausiai . 157
SFX 18494 i iausia [^t]i 1598
SFX 18494 ti čiausia . 1598

SFX 18497 Y 1
SFX 18497 i ėliau . 155

SFX 18502 Y 5
SFX 18502 g g . 1597
SFX 18502 0 el . 1599
SFX 18502 0 iau . 152
SFX 18502 0 iausia . 157
SFX 18502 0 iausiai . 1600

SFX 18505 Y 1
SFX 18505 0 ėliau . 155

SFX 18508 Y 4
SFX 18508 a a [^it]a 1597
SFX 18508 a iau [^it]a 152
SFX 18508 a iausia [^it]a 157
SFX 18508 a iausiai [^it]a 1600

SFX 18510 Y 1
SFX 18510 a ėliau [^it]a 155

SFX 18513 Y 28
SFX 18513 ui ui [^dij]ui 1597
SFX 18513 ui iau [^dij]ui 152
SFX 18513 ui iausiai [^dij]ui 157
SFX 18513 ui iausia [^dij]ui 1598
SFX 18513 iui iui [^čž]iui 1597
SFX 18513 iui iau [^čž]iui 152
SFX 18513 iui iausiai [^čž]iui 157
SFX 18513 iui iausia [^čž]iui 1598
SFX 18513 čiui čiui . 1597
SFX 18513 čiui čiau . 152
SFX 18513 čiui čiausiai . 157
SFX 18513 čiui čiausia . 1598
SFX 18513 žiui žiui [^d]žiui 1597
SFX 18513 žiui žiau [^d]žiui 152
SFX 18513 žiui žiausiai [^d]žiui 157
SFX 18513 žiui žiausia [^d]žiui 1598
SFX 18513 džiui džiui . 1597
SFX 18513 džiui džiau . 152
SFX 18513 džiui džiausiai . 157
SFX 18513 džiui džiausia . 1598
SFX 18513 dui dui . 1597
SFX 18513 dui džiau . 152
SFX 18513 dui džiausiai . 157
SFX 18513 dui džiausia . 1598
SFX 18513 jui jui . 1597
SFX 18513 jui jau . 152
SFX 18513 jui jausiai . 157
SFX 18513 jui jausia . 1598

SFX 18515 Y 7
SFX 18515 ui ėliau [^dij]ui 155
SFX 18515 iui ėliau [^čž]iui 155
SFX 18515 čiui tėliau . 155
SFX 18515 žiui žėliau [^d]žiui 155
SFX 18515 džiui dėliau . 155
SFX 18515 dui dėliau . 155
SFX 18515 jui jėliau . 155

SFX 18548 Y 6
SFX 18548 iau iau [^č]iau 152
SFX 18548 iau iausiai [^č]iau 157
SFX 18548 iau iausia [^č]iau 1598
SFX 18548 čiau čiau . 152
SFX 18548 čiau čiausiai . 157
SFX 18548 čiau čiausia . 1598

SFX 18549 Y 2
SFX 18549 iau ėliau [^č]iau 155
SFX 18549 čiau tėliau . 155

SFX 18556 Y 3
SFX 18556 omis omis . 1597
SFX 18556 omis om . 1601
SFX 18556 a a . 1597

SFX 18559 Y 2
SFX 18559 iausiai iausiai . 157
SFX 18559 iausiai iausia . 1598

SFX 18561 Y 2
SFX 18561 iausia iausia . 157
SFX 18561 iausia iausiai . 1600
